Massachusetts, session 194th, H206.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 25 of Chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following words:- Children in the custody 
of some suitable person or licensed agency providing foster care for children or the department 
for not less than eighteen months shall have the right to be emancipated from their biological 
parents if said parents have not fulfilled court ordered obligations.